test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTI_AM_IMP_waabandam_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VTA+Imp - am - waabndam :
     
  #Template Key
  #NO TEMPLATE
     
     #immediate forms eat the -am theme!
     #negative forms keeping n# ... lost in VAI
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+2: waabndan
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+2+Pl: waabndamok
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl+0: waabndaa
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Imm+2+1+Pl+0+Pl: waabndaanin
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Del+2: waabndamookan
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Del+2+Pl: waabndamookeg
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Del+2+1+Pl: waabndamookang
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2: waabndamngen #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2: waabndamangen #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2+Pl: waabndamngegon #cons
     #waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2+Pl: waabndamangegon #book
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+0: waabndanziidaa
     waabndaan+VTI+Imp+Neg+2+1+Pl+0+Pl: waabndanziidaanin #book indicates suff is -daanin, but gives exe of waabndanziidaanin
